Florida, session 2026, SB422.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 330.42, Florida Statutes, is created to 12 read: 13 330.42âAutomatic dependent surveillance-broadcasts.â 14 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 15 (a)ââAircraftâ has the same meaning as in s. 330.27, except 16 that the aircraft must have a gross weight of 12,499 pounds or 17 less and operate under 14 C.F.R. part 91. 18 (b)ââAutomatic dependent surveillance-broadcastâ or âADS-Bâ 19 means an advanced aviation surveillance technology that combines 20 an aircraftâs positioning source, the aircraftâs avionics, and a 21 ground infrastructure to create an accurate surveillance 22 interface between an aircraft and air traffic control. The term 23 includes two different services, ADS-B In and ADS-B Out, which 24 can provide information, such as an aircraftâs global 25 positioning system location, altitude, ground speed, and other 26 data, to ground stations and other aircraft, as well as weather 27 and traffic information to aircraft operators. 28 (c)ââTouch-and-go landingâ means an operation by an 29 aircraft that lands and departs on a runway without stopping or 30 exiting the runway. 31 (2)âAn airport may not use information broadcast or 32 collected by automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast systems, 33 regardless of whether that data originates from ADS-B In or ADS 34 B Out, as a means for calculating, generating, and collecting 35 fees from aircraft owners or operators who operate aircraft 36 within the geographic boundaries of this state under the 37 following circumstances: 38 (a)âWhen the operation for which a fee would be assessed is 39 a departure or a landing, including, but not limited to, a 40 touch-and-go landing. 41 (b)âWhen the fee would be assessed based on an aircraft 42 entering into a specified radius of the airspace of the airport 43 assessing the fee. 44 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.